
                   Easier test. Hard homework. She likes interactive students.
                
                   Be ready to interact with her in class - she likes participation. Do the homework even if she's not going to grade it, test questions often come from those. She's willing to spend hours helping you during her office hours if you are clearly putting in the effort, and will walk you through problems. Really cares about her students.
                
                   Although the class was very easy for me, it was difficult for the freshmen. This very rude and unhelpful professor requires attendance and records it every day. Unfortunately her lectures are totally useless. The most annoying thing is that the tests are nothing like the homework or the lecture problems, so you have to really know the material.
                
                   She knows the subject matter well, but can not always communicate it for the entire class to understand. She is reude an degrading. Do not wear your feelings on your sleeve. Read the textbook...
                
                   Intelligent and intent on in class interaction- her personality may at times come across as intimidating, but her heart is for her students success. She is more than willing to help you if you show you are actually putting in an effort. The course itself fast paced, math intensive, and requires a LOT of out of class study to get a good grade.
                
                   She's a little crazy, but just go with her obsessive compulsiveness, and you'll be fine.  Lots and lots of homework.  She is super helpful outside of class.  Not an easy A.
                
                   He is a good proffesor, test arrent to hard. He test your understanding, does not to confuse you. Doesnt curve, work hard to get an a, not to hard to get a c.
                
                   He can be kinda scary at first, but he's helpful as anything if you ask for it. He's also quite responsive in lecture. And the Russian accent is fun, he knows what he needs to say in English, even if sometimes it takes a while to say.
                
                   
                
                   Great professor. Very clear in what he is explaining (uses the board tons for pictures to help you out, doesn't go too fast if people are confused). Accent not bad. Shows real physics behind equations for those who care. Grades on a curve. Always open to questions and willing to help. Has some sense of humor to keep you from being completely bored.
                
                   Bassichis is somewhat of a physics legend. His lectures are very entertaining and sometimes he'll go off on random tangents, but that's just Bassichis. Major key of the class is the textbook, it's a great short and readable textbook that will allow you to master the material. However, his tests will roast you if you don't know the material well.
                
                   One of the hardest classes at A&M. To get at least a B in the class you will have to be willing to read the book throughout the semester and do problems. However, he did grade pretty fairly and you will get used to the pace of the course pretty quickly. I honestly thought going to class was pretty unhelpful and pretty much read the book and got a B
                
                   Dr. Bassichis will tell you on Day 1 that everybody is perfectly capable of making A's and B's in his class, it just depends on how much work you put into getting that grade. And it's true: if you don't understand, you need to read and do problems on your own that don't count towards your grade. No homework, free response tests, quiz every lecture.
                
                   phenomenal professor.
                
                   I enjoyed taking Physics from Bassichis. He makes the class sound really hard, but if you READ THE BOOK and make sure you understand how to do all problems you can make an A. I enjoy the book (Bassichis wrote it) and its easy to follow, very equation based. If you go to him for help, expect some sarcasm but he will help, don't be deterred.
                
                   Too smart to teach. Will make you feel dumb if you ask a question. Decent person but terrible teacher, unless you're into teaching yourself. Loved his cheesy humor which made class somewhat tolerable. Clicker quizzes were extremely hard and seemingly irrelevant. Essentially no curve whatsoever. Every test the class average is 40-50. 
                
                   I would recommend any other professor. His lectures are confusing and usually discuss anything but physics. During office hours he is borderline rude, although if you're willing to endure a few insults you can eventually get a little bit of help.
                
                   Grades overall for the course or final only. He likes to crack jokes in lectures for comic relief.
                
                   He is an extremely smart man so he teaches the material like you've been around physics as long as he has. He teaches like that so you will open up the book and read it. His lectures are all over the place, his handwriting is awful, and his voice is clear, but not too loud, so sit in the front. READ THE BOOK. It's so helpful.
                
                   Bassichis was a great professor! The material is tough, be he makes the best of it. He uses his own book which is very straight forward. You only learn the four Maxwell equations in his class and you are able to solve all the problems on his tests and in the book. This is a tough course, so have fun with it!
                
                   As long as you keep up in class you'll do well, he has a different style of grading, so just because you fail a test or two doesn't mean you fail the class, you just have to keep with it, and if you go to him for help he is actually very helpful.
                
                   Not a good teacher. He's very difficult to understand, and he speaks perfect english. Although he is funny and holds attention, his teaching skills are extremely poor. Study hard outside of class to pass his course. Too bad he uses his own textbook to teach, it's awful as well.
                
                   tough class but great prof
                
                   Brilliant professor, tough class. Final exam is vital to grade. 
                
                   He is a smart man and knows his stuff very well. I found his lectures helpful and I learned more than I ever thought I would. However, the class is hard and you have to spend a lot of time studying if you want a chance of passing. He isn't very helpful, but he wrote the text book and if you read it, he explains things well. 
                
                   I don't know how much he curves his midterms but its not enough if you make 60 averages the whole year. A on the final is an A in the class but good luck performing that miracle. If you can take this at a community college do it. Not worth having to listen to him ridicule the entire class for not being good enough to be engineers.
                
                   I recommend him for advanced/hardworking students only. Do not be discouraged by the terrible reviews this guy has. People that fail his course are those that do not even bother to pick up the book or ask him for help. He is a good physics teacher; his fundamental approach to physics enhances your understanding very well.
                
                   I went to his office for help. Received NO HELP. In fact, he said 12 words to me, then went to his desk and began doing something on his computer. Then he literally kicked me out after being in there for 15 minutes.
                
                   He is a great professor, as long as you listen in class and read the book.
                
                   Encourages students to learn on their own from the beginning. Very little sympathy for students and is set in his ways.
                
                   Gives you a quiz almost every day on information that he hasn't taught yet, but expects you to learn yourself by reading his book that he expects you to read over multiple times. He said even he has to read over the book sometimes, and he wrote it.
                
                   He is a good teacher, but you need to put in the work on your part. Getting an A on the final is an A in the course. Also, everything is graded on a curve based on the average in your particular class. All in all, do your work and you will be fine. If your not going to work you have no business being in any physics class in the first place.
                
                   He prepares you for later courses in engineering. As long as you put your time into his class, you will do fine. A in final=A in course.
                
                   He's an intelligent guy, he just goes off on his own things. Good if you're really into the fine details of physics. Not so much if you just want to deal with numbers and the application of physics (Engineering)
                
                   Worst professor at TAMU.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great Professor, only class i attended regularly this semester just because of his interesting lectures. Helpful book also. Will leave you with an understanding of the concepts if you are willing to put in the effort.
                
                   Unless you are a math major, this guy is not for you. He is variables all the way, and had his own way of doing things, you couldnt get help from others in other classes because they were all different from Basichis. Darn, he even wrote Hookes law in a different way. Anyway, he is a fun professor, and he'll help you if you go to his office hours.GL
                
                   great teacher. If you want to do well in his class you must be willing to commit yourself to reading the chapters before class, doing all the problems in his book, and studying at least 3 days before his tests. In other words, do what you're supposed to do in college. If you do badly on a test go to his office, this will help your grade in the end.
                
                   Go to his office hours as often as possible and he'll find a way to give you an A or a B.
                
                   Horrible, difficult, confusing.  He gave like 3-5 quizzes every day on material he had not even covered yet.  Thankfully when I had him it was the first year of the foundation coalition (96&#63;) and since they curved the grades so much my 37, 82, 52 on the final and ~33% on the quizzes curved to a C.  Do not take him.
                
                   I do not like the way he teaches. He does not encourage students doing practical problems using numbers. He always uses variables. I am not sure how a Prof. thinks all the students are Einstein to derive E=Mc2. I do not recommend him.
                
                   Dr. Chin was a lot harder than Ford. His averages usually were in the 50's. However he did curve to where most of the class got a B. I made an 80 in the class and got an A. He was pretty hard to understand during lecture and his tests were insane but he did make sure to curve a lot at the end of the semester. 
                
                   HORRIBLE PROFESSOR. He doesn't care about his students grades and is not very helpful to help you study if you are struggling.
                
                   MISERABLE class. he is hard to understand, spends the whole class deriving equations as opposed to showing examples. His tests are 50x harder than other profs, makes up questions on the test that you have never seen before (not to mention they are hand drawn and are impossible to understand). iClicker quizzes every class, NO help in office hours
                
                   This class was terrible. I ended up failing it. When you asked questions you felt stupid. Take University Physics, not "Don't Panic" physics!
                
                   I never knew physics could be so physical.
                
                   Dhar is by far one of the best professors I've had hands down. He is always willing to go out of his way to help the students and make sure that they understand the material. I would definitely love to take Dhar again.
                
                   Barun Dhar is an amazing professor. He teaches with passion, common sense, and most of all DISCIPLINE!!! Discipline is the key. As long as you have discipline, Barun will go to great lengths to help you succeed, even staying past midnight in office hours. His lectures cover misconceptions, his office hours cover specific homework problems.
                
                   Id never taken physics before, but Dhar really worked with me. Best prof ever; hardest class I've ever taken. Keep an open mind, do HW properly & go to office hours! Youll gain a solid foundation in physics, but also in problem solving & work ethic. Youll work your butt off. Its worth it. Hes systematic  its hard to mess up using his  ways.
                
                   I've never taken a single physics course before 218 w/ Dr. Dhar. I got an A in the class solely because of how helpful and caring Dr. Dhar is. One night he stayed until 1 am at office hours to help with homework concept questions. For those who are leaving bad reviews all I can say is that I never once saw them at office hours. Come on people, TRY!
                
                   Dr. Dhar is an excellent professor. He teaches a very systematic approach to problem solving that is beneficial to all majors especially engineers. You have to put in effort on homework and go to his lectures but it is for your benefit. His office hours also help a lot. Bottom line, if you want to challenge yourself  and learn, choose Dr. Dhar.
                
                   Dr. Dhar is one of those very few professors who actually care about his students, he is always there for you. He trains you like a Spartan not to make you suffer, but so that you can survive and win at PHYS 218 and your future endeavors. I never even went to office hours because his lectures were so sufficient. If you're not lazy you can succeed.
                
                   Dhar is the best professor I've ever had. He helped me understand concepts and misconceptions, and because of this, I feel like I understand the material inside and out. Office hours is where his personality really comes through and his passion for seeing students succeed flourishes. He's always there for any student, even until 1 am.
                
                   He was the best professor/teacher I have ever had.  He's willing to do anything to see a student succeed if they've been trying.  I've been in his office hours till 1 AM multiple times, he's bought us dinner, he's even walked students who live in Northgate home after office hours.  He is so dedicated and so entertaining, just GO TO OFFICE HOURS!
                
                   the course was tough, but if you put in the effort by doing the homework and listened during lectures you will do well. he's a great professor who is always willing to help you if you go to his office hours and really cares about his students success.
                
                   Dhar is a tough professor. He expects you to do a lot of work and to really understand the material. That said if you face any trouble you can always go to him for help and he will do anything in his power to help you understand, including staying in office hours until after 1 am. He genuinely cares about his students but won't let you off easy.
                
                   Take this professor only if you can deal with a lot of homework and very high level physics concepts. He is an excellent professor, but requires considerable work and participation. Use his office hours AND the TA's office hours, they're both there to help you, the TA's can help with more time. Don't miss any class or recitation.
                
                   This is not an easy class-regardless of the professor. After going through Dhars class, I feel like I have learned the material inside out. Dhar will push you to understand concepts and learn how to think critically. Most importantly, he is always willing to help you. He always responds to your emails and always makes himself available.
                
                   Most aggravating class and professor I've ever had. Homeworks are excruciating, lectures are full of basic, conceptual info and extremely specific ways to think about problems, but rarely any actual concrete methods to get you to the answer. I'm doing a homework right now and I'm stuck on a problem and can't move on until I get it. So impractical.
                
                   Dr. Dhar is a very caring professor with a great personality, but his class made me feel like I was going to drop out of college. He teaches in a style that would appeal to students who want to be a physician, not to students that just want to get phys218 checked off the list. His homework's such (long and tedious) and his lectures were confusing.
                
                   If you are not passionate about physics and already have a high aptitude for it, DO NOT TAKE HIM! You will cry every day. He lectures at a fast pace, but if you go to office hours HE'LL HELP YOU. He is a nice guy (he once bought pizza for his office hours), but he will push you hard. He expects physics to be your life, and IT WILL BECOME YOUR LIFE!
                
                   He is a tough teacher. However his test average  for his class is well above the curve.  He does not give you simple answers; he makes you think. He makes you develop relationships not just plug and chug into some silly formula. He makes you understand the concept real well. For my first semester, Dhar became my life. Well worth it Ags
                
                   Dhar is the type of professor that would be alright if you already have a background in Physics from high school. If you don't, good luck keeping up with his sporadic teaching style. He won't work practice questions, and he will try to confuse you in class. Do no take 
                
                   Honestly, Dr. Dhar is the best professor I've ever had. Yes the material is hard, but he didn't invent physics. His homework assignments are tough but doing them and understanding them will make you more than prepared for the exams. He is so willing to help and will stay with you in office hours until you understand. He's the reason I survived.
                
                   All thsee bad ratings don't really pur this class into perspective. The freshman physics courses are hard, Barun gives you the resources to pass with flying colors. Do exactly what he tells you to do outside of class and you will destroy the averages on the exams. Don't and you'll probably come on here to complain about how he didn't teach anything
                
                   After reading the positive reviews, I figured Dhar would be a wonderful professor. He wasn't. The lectures are hardly helpful in learning the material. The homework is quite hard, and he locks the problems so that you must go in order - making the primary goal to frantically finish rather than to learn.  You'll likely have to teach yourself.
                
                   If you work to understand the formulas he gives and go to his office hours, you will be fine.
                
                   Eusebi is one of the best physics professors that teach at Texas A&M. Attending office hours is highly beneficial to your success in the class, especially if you go in with good questions. Trying to learn physics without doing a ton of problems for practice is unrealistic, regardless of the prof you have. Btw, he restates anything you can't read.
                
                   If he received a grade in penmanship or clarity it would reflect the average on the PHYS218  exam 3. The course is difficult due to the material and he knows a lot but he is not the best at translating it to his students. The only way to do well in the class is to complete countless problems from the book till you hopefully understand the material.
                
                   Worst teacher ever. Cannot write at all and assumes that you know how to get to the final answer and doesn't explain any of his problems. Do not take him at all by far the worst teacher ever 
                
                   Eusebi is a good instructor who teaches the material very well. He has a lot of knowledge and is aware that the course is hard in general. You have to work hard in this course to earn a good grade regardless of the professor. But only take Eusebi if Dhar isn't available. 
                
                   He is a very enthusiastic teacher. I enjoyed going to his lectures. Physics 218 is hard but he made it better. The curve wasn't that great. There are clicker quizzes in his class. Be ready to work hard.
                
                   People are saying his tests are harder than other professor's, but the exams are common exams, so every professor has the same ones.  I thought he was a great professor, physics is just a hard class.  Trust me, if you have to take 218, he's the one to take it from. 
                
                   He is a fairly decent instructor at the lectures. He knows it's a difficult course by nature, and he is willing to help you. Although he has an accent, he is aware of it and tries to ensure that the class can understand the material despite it. I would definitely recommend. 
                
                   Eusebi is a great prof, dont get me wrong this class is hard as nuts but he is extremely helpful and his accent is not to bad. You will get alot out of his class. Word to the wise don't answer any question unless you are sure you know the answer
                
                   Eusebi wasn't bad of a teacher at all! I always asked questions after class when I needed a better understanding and he helped a lot. I really recommend attending every class; physics is just plain hard in general! His grades are based on a point-scale. Good Luck!
                
                   He's a great person, but very bad instructor. He thinks we know everything he does. His tests are insanely hard, harder than other profs, but that's also the nature of the course in general. If you are active in class, go to recitation, and use his office hours you should do fine.
                
                   Awesome teacher. Hard class
                
                   Fry's Exams were tough. Made a 20 on my first exam. Good thing is he drops the lowest exam grade (final not included) and three of the lowest quiz grades. The exams are hard to study for but he does however let you have an equation sheet for the exams, which makes it easier. But overall a very, very tough class. 
                
                   I am also reviewing Mr. Finklestein to clear up the mass confusion. I am currently taking him for my physics class and it's been an honor. I do admit the tests were really hard, but he tells you what to study. The study guide as well as the lectures are more than enough. It's also vital to read the textbook, but which class doesn't. Hope this helps
                
                   Me. Finklestein changed my life. I had to take physics for my first semester during my junior year and he was amazing. Don't listen to the other 2 reviewers. If you read the book, apply you knowledge learned from the lecture, and pay attention to the minor details you will get an A. Out of my past years he was my favorite professor by far. Take him
                
                   If you read the other rating of him taking forever to make a simple, complete sentence, it's a perfect description. He speaks at a second grade reading level and loves to draw the pictures on the board that are already on the big screen he uses. HE TALKS (inaudibly) THROUGHOUT TESTS! Research is his niche, and he should stay there without teaching.
                
                   worst professor. talks to the board and has no idea what questions you are asking him. Has a thick accent and takes 1000 hours to formulate a comprehensible sentence. hardly any people showed up to the 2 hr lecture because it literally was a waste of time; you'd better off reading the book, which isn't great either.
                
                   You need to have a good background in calculus to do well.  I didn't read the book, but I know those who did, did better than me  THIS IS "DON'T PANIC" PHYS218!  I think the material is just difficult overall, he does his best to convey the concepts and is extremely passionate.  I heard he writes the tests and Erukhimova approves it.
                
                   Dr. Fries is a great guy! He tries very hard to make the lectures interesting, and always answers questions mid lecture about content. He cares very much about his students' grades, and quickly responds to emails during the day. I highly recommend Dr. Fries.
                
                   Dr. Fries serves to make an already difficult topic even more difficult and confusing. His notes that he posts online are semi-helpful. He does clicker questions in class so attendance is basically mandatory. His lectures are clouded by a lot of fluff and not enough examples and "need to knows" for the tests. NO CURVE. Take another prof if you can!
                
                   Fries goes into his own world when he lectures. The things he covers are usually just the theories but never goes over examples of what the tests are like. He makes the simplest of things like antiderivatives sound complicated. A-plus tutoring helped a lot though. The help-desk can be semi-helpful too, but I prefer tutoring.
                
                   This prof is super sweet but he often doesn't understand that you're trying to get points back on a test when you go to talk to him, so just be blunt. Otherwise, this is a hard class in general and his notes are super helpful.
                
                   Very good pls take
                
                   Dr. Hardy is a really nice guy and a pretty good teacher. He teaches you all the basics in class, but the level of class work is a lot lower than homework which is lower than tests. He's helpful, but if you plan to only take the class and never ask for help, good luck. 
                
                   Dr. Hardy isn't the best.  I would say if you are passionate about learning physics take Dr. Dhar, but if you want the easier A take Dr. Hardy.  He's nothing special, he follows the textbook. Do your homework multiple times and your just about guaranteed an A.
                
                   His tests are comprised of 3-5 questions worth lots of points, and a few smaller questions based on his lectures. I'd recommend going to those if you can but you won't miss too much. He gives a lot of feedback on how the class did on tests, and grades partial credit. Lots of homework, but very understanding. He gives a HUGE formula sheet for tests.
                
                   I received a better grade than I excepted. This is coming from a a student who never took physics in high school.  The best tip I can give you is to get to know him, go to his office hours, study his old exams and study his power points for exams. The only real problem with him is that he has a accent and its hard to understand most of the time.
                
                   Hard to understand because of his thick accent. Attended every class and still felt lost. His tests are very hard and the hw does not help you understand anything. Avoid him at all costs!!
                
                   Attend class and office hours. If he knows you personally he will go out of his way to help you succeed. He is always respectful of the class, answers most questions in lecture, and his notes are clear (which helps with the language barrier). He is flexible with HW deadlines. Tests are exactly like the HW. HW also gives up to a 10pt bonus on exams.
                
                   can't understand him, lots of online HW, and his notes are impossible to understand as well. If you must take him, invest in a tutor and read all of the chapters. Do all of the problems in the back of the book and do all of your homework. Thats the only way you'll survive. DONT DO IT
                
                   Stay away from this guy.
                
                   HARD
                
                   He is the worst phys teacher i have ever had. He has a bad habit of making fun of students who have trouble, while he lacks the ability to clearly convey the material.  His notes are all writen on top of pwr point slides and his accent is difficult to understand. Doesnt even make up his own notes.
                
                   Horrendous.  His tests/curriculum is geared towards physics majors despite the majority of his class being non-physics majors.  During one test review he shouted at the class "I make tests that I think are challenging."  Very condescending towards students when asked questions and would go off topic about study habits, etc...rather than teach
                
                   Dr. K is great. He gets irritated if his students don't know basic mathematics and at least some calculus.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He goes off topic alot which makes class time more bearable, however he doesn't teach very well.
                
                   PHYS 208 at at Texas A&M is difficult no matter which professor you have. Don't change your schedule around to avoid Dr. Kocharovskaya. She is a very nice professor,  never annoyed by questions, and is often very generous in giving points back on exams . Unfortunately she is hard to follow in lecture, definitely buy the book and read it thoroughly.
                
                   Hardest class you will ever take.  The drop rate is extremely high and this class makes you rethink your life's choices. 
                
                   Olga is a physics genius, and a really nice lady. But she's not a good teacher. A lot of students have a hard time understanding what she's saying and writing, and you're not going to learn anything from lectures. Exams are hard, but fair. She's not a bad professor to have for 208, but you should go to A+  if you want to pass the course.
                
                   She does clicker questions at beginning of very lecture. Also her lectures will lose you in all the math. Very hard to understand. Usually does give points back on test if you go to her office hours. She does try to help you learn what you've done wrong on the test in office hours but she is just very hard to understand. Overall just a hard class.
                
                   I recommend an A+ tutoring pass. You won't regret it. She is a nice, sweet lady. I never failed a test but most people do. 208 will be hard no matter what, READ THE BOOK. REALLY UNDERSTAND IT.
                
                   Her lectures do not flow well, at times very confusing.  Most of the time not understandable. Better to just read the book and not waste time with her yawn-inducing lectures.
                
                   Professor Ko seems to be a very intelligent man. That being said, he's an awful professor. His lectures are very confusing through his thick accent, and he speaks so quietly you can barely hear him, even sitting in the front. On the first test the class average was a 45. All other PHYS201 professors had an average of around 65. DO NOT TAKE
                
                   Dr. Kocharovsky is not the easiest professor but he does have his benefits. He is incredibly helpful during office hours but his lectures are occasionally irrelevant in terms of the common exam. His final was easy because he gave us a list of 20 problems prior to the final, and chose 5 of them for the actual test.  
                
                   It's true that his lectures aren't the best. I taught myself the material and got an A. He likes students who work hard, and he will give back points on tests afterwards, if you go to his office hours and make a good case for yourself.        Also, he exempted some students from the final exam, students who did well on the physics challenge exam.
                
                   From my review, it seems like he's a bad professor, but he's not. He could do better presenting the information, but I honestly learned better from the textbook, and going to class didn't really help my understanding. He's there for you if you need the help, but sometimes it's still confusing. I ended up with a B, but I was never good at physics.
                
                   Although he is a brilliant individual, in my opinion Vitaly is the worst physics professor at A&M. His lectures are impossible to understand, and he teaches 3 chapters ahead of every other professor. In other words, each exam covers material you were supposed to have learned 3 weeks ago while he lecture over the next set of chapters. Do not take.
                
                   He has terribly strong accent, which makes his lectures almost pointless. If you go to his office hours he will go over anything you'd like and that is probably your best best. The common tests are impossible since he doesn't teach much, but his final was very easy since he put it together himself.
                
                   He has a very think Russian accent. Extremely smart man, but he says everything is "trivial" instead of teaching it. The only reason I passed this class was because of tutoring. Office hours aren't even helpful, and forget trying to learn from his power points. 
                
                   Horrible teacher, He has the among the worst test averages among all physics classes, and says everything "is trivial" Half the class does homework for another class during his lectures while the other half that listens claim to come out more confused than they went in. maybe 35% of students Q dropped him. The only reason Ill pass is  self taught.
                
                   I didn't get much out of the lectures for this class. I went to class for attendance points and tried to comprehend stuff but wasn't always successful. I learned the most from online homework (long but not difficult and not assigned every week). The lab was pretty interesting and helped boost my grade. Somehow managed to finish with an A!
                
                   Despite not knowing how hard it was going to be when I registered, I'm really glad I took Dr. Krisciunas' class. He's a really funny guy (he's famous for dressing up as Copernicus & singing about the planets) & he had some great stories too. The tests though were hard, so study well & understand the material. It was hard, but I learned a lot! 
                
                   I took this course for an easy science credit. This course was the complete opposite of that. There is a good amount of reading and weekly homework. The exams are very challenging. Overall if you are looking for an easy science credit do not take this professor or course. 
                
                   Dr. Krisciunas is a very nice and interesting guy. He sings during lecture occasionally which is pretty entertaining. Super intelligent and interesting to listen to but, he does go on tangents way beyond the scope of the course which can make it really easy to zone out. Go to class, do the homework, and take good notes and you will get a B at least
                
                   The lecture only covers a small amount of test material.  He may be funny in class, but his grading will kill your GPA 
                
                   SUCH A BORING CLASS. Was expecting a fun easy A. Made an A but had to work for it. His lectures make me want to fall asleep. 
                
                   This class was awful. I took it thinking it would be an easy science... It will cripple your GPA. His test reviews are basically just for fun and his lectures will make you wish you were dead. Takes clicker questions for attendance so you have to show up. I would definitely not recommend this prof to anyone.
                
                   Dr. Krisciunas is one of my favorite professors I've ever taken. There's about a 10 point curve on all the tests, so as long as you study, you'll be fine. Honestly one of my favorite classes and I'm a business major!
                
                   Dr. Krisciunas is a great prof! He sings and dresses up in class. He is very interesting and helpful. This is one of my favorite classes. It isn't too hard. Just read the textbook, memorize what he tells you, and do the online homework and you are good.
                
                   Really interesting to listen to! He dresses up and sings. Clicker questions every class, but participation points for attempting to answer. He's funny and nice and gives several extra credit opportunities.
                
                   This class was very entertaining and interesting. While Professor Krisciunas' lecture are sometimes confusing (just a lot of information that isn't necessary), he held my attention all semester. Sit as close to the front as you can (to see his equations), attend class to answer clicker questions, and study his online reviews. Great class!
                
                   Attendance is taken with clicker questions, so show up for class. If you have any hope of passing the class, show up for class. Clicker questions help your grade. He gets his exam questions from online concept quizzes and reviews. His class is very interesting. I enjoyed going to class. I found it helpful to print out the notes.
                
                   Very entertaining, he sings in class and does lots of clicker questions which really do help your grade. He also gave 2 pop quizzes- so go to class! The text-book helps alot, and he gives online homework!
                
                   Attendance is usually taken via iClicker questions. His lectures are very entertaining, but don't always follow the textbook...or the class subject for that matter.
                
                   His lectures are hard to follow and the tests are quite difficult but the class is fun other than the actual content :)
                
                   Igor doesn't get as much credit as he deserves. He has a Russian accent and speaks in somewhat broken english, but it was not difficult for me to understand at all (seemed like everyone's biggest complaint). His lectures are VERY helpful, although miss 1 question on a test and your grade will drop substantially :-/ I loved him as a teacher though.
                
                   Fantastic teacher, though accent was interesting. Very thorough and I enjoyed his class. The procrastinators failed, but if you do your work you will be pleased. He know his subject very well.
                
                   Igor cannot express what he is trying to say in English. He fails to cover the overall concept of a lecture, much less mention out of all his lecture the important material, where &quot;most&quot; of the material is not important and mumble the most important concepts. You will not truly learn in his class. By guessing how to use equations, you can get a C.
                
                   Complete jerk. Argues with students and takes offense to even nice and innocent questions. Tests are extremley hard and Igor does not see it nessesary for a curve. DO NOT TAKE HIM.
                
                   Mechanical physics is not easy, but Mahapatra is the best way to go. He is the leader of the top research in the world at the moment, the study and search for dark matter. In other words, he is a genius, which sometimes makes him go a little fast. He ALWAYS answers questions though and always holds office hours. NEVER skip SmartPhysics pre lecture.
                
                   For physics he makes his own test, and it can be hard to predict what is on the test. Over all if you study and do ALOT of practice problems you should pass. He does curve, but don't expect much. He can loose some students when he explains, but a good teacher to expose you to the over all topics.
                
                   
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The best course in advanced particle physics I''ve ever had.
                
                   He expects you to understand the most difficult topics the first time you see them. His in class examples are impossible to understand. The worst teacher I have ever had. His tests vary, most of the time they are straight from mastering physics. The TA's are great though. Very helpful and great at explaining the concepts so you can understand them
                
                   Dr. Oh is so unhelpful all he did was walk in the class write stuff down on the board not explaining any of it and then looks back and asks questions&#63; We would ask different things but he would mumble off and leave you confused. Also, my TA sucked so that didn't help.
                
                   Doesnt apply out and apply problems. even if he did he is so unclear it wouldnt help. definately avoid if possible or invest in a lot of tutoring
                
                   This guy sucks hard. You have to learn everything on your own. Tests are hard. Bad accent.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He doesn't always speek clearly but i can usually still figure out what i need to learn!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Barely spoke english and thought all of the students were stupid.  Avoid at all costs - take Ford instead!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Knows a lot about physics, but not very good at teaching it. Sometimes difficult to understand his lecture sometimes. Went once to his office for help was not helpful and was rude. You have 4 difficult exams with a curve built-in and the final was really a make up to replace lowest exam grade. I do not recommend him.
                
                   Reading covers his own problems and usually does not line up well with the book. He gives HW everyday and no partial credit on exams. He gave our class 2 makeup exams that replaced our old exams. He gave a book report with 10 letter points possible. He is more helpful in office hours than in the class. It is a difficult class.
                
                   Ridiculous class. Exams incredibly difficult. Not multiple choice OR short answer so if you get don't get the exact right number for everything you fail. It's the first class I ever failed. He's totally unhelpful, usually not even talking about  physics and the book doesn't help either.
                
                   Dr. Reading is an old British guy that loves history, philosophy and physics. He lets you read the book on your own and relies on his made up questions-no mastering physics. He's everywhere and while some people did well, I was scrambling to keep up. He gives alot of bonus, there is no final and there's a makeup exam to replace a bad grade.
                
                   I would never suggest you take class with him because you will not learn all most everything he taught. You might got an A if you are lucky enough or you got a friend who is a physics graduated student. The book is almost useless. He just ask you to read so you can get basic ideas. If you are going to take his class, check help desk for help.
                
                   I would take Dr. Ross again in a heart beat. His lectures exude professionalism and his expertise in Physics is clear from the get-go. He wastes little time and does his best to ensure your understanding as well. For such a difficult subject, he simplifies it as best as he can, and seems to care that students wish to do well. Take him if you can.
                
                   Dr. Ross is a decent prof that's always willing to help when you need it. He is sort of soft-spoken and timid. Overall, he is a really nice guy, but his lectures can be unclear sometimes, although he will do his best to help you out if you need some extra info.
                
                   Has an accent, but not too difficult to understand. Does a good job teaching the material. Tests are difficult, but doable if you study. If you put in the effort, it is definitely possible to get an A.
                
                   Safonov is an advocate of tough love, he teaches you what you need to know in lecture but he makes you work for the grade. He was good at explaining concepts and answering questions. He is a difficult grader but only because you should know how to do it. Don't take him if you don't expect to work for it!
                
                   The tests are really difficult and he does a poor job of explaining his work on a problem during lecture. He gives off the vibe of not caring if he makes a lot of students fail.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM.  His tests are ridiculous. He would show up late and not give us the entire class to finish him.  He was very rude during office hours, and did not seem very interested in making sure we learned the material.  I would never take a class with him again.
                
                   If you want to do well on the tests, read the chapter, know the concepts, and DO THE PICTURE PROBLEMS IN THE EXERCISES FROM THE CHAPTER! He always uses book problems on the test, always. And they are always the picture diagram ones.
                
                   Says his goal is to make students fail. He is very intelligent but he definitely teaches too quick.
                
                   Good prof, uses good examples in class, gives out candy for asking good questions in class
                
                   If you have a good foundation in physics you should be fine but if you're like me who had a terrible high school physics teacher, it can be hard to catch up as Safanov tends to go pretty quickly through the material and it's easy to miss concepts or not understand what's going on.
                
                   It is a tough teacher but he clearly demonstrates what he is doing and gives you step by step instructions. The homework isn't bad but the tests are pretty tough. He is a good prof.
                
                   ..
                
                   He is TOUGH but he is better than some other professors that I have heard about.  Try to get Professor White and if you can not get him get Professor Safanov.  4 tests. Online homework (mastering physics) that you have to get a 70 or higher on or you fail, but these are extremely easy, my lowest grade is like a 92, easy if you work in groups.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very Nice.  Helpful if you go to her office hours.  Give lots of partial credit on exams.  Highly recommended.
                
                   I couldn't understand anything that was said in lecture
                
                   Great Professor!!! He always comes in with energy and has ways to get the class involved when solving for problems in class.   Recommend asking questions and letting him know you.  He will attempt to learn your name and before the semester ends, he would know the majority of the class (that is the ones that introduce themselves).
                
                   Great professor. Knows the material very well and can teach it well. Will explain anything to you in as many different ways that he can. Also is pretty funny and doesn't put you to sleep.
                
                   He's a good professor but struggles sometimes to explain himself when someone asks a question. You can tell Strigari knows the material and is willing to help you out if you don't understand something but do expect to work for that A. As long as you pay attention  and take notes and go over the homework TWICE, you'll be good. He's a cool guy too.
                
                   Respects students and is very willing to help if you ask for it. Lectures are very interesting; the professor is extremely knowledgeable of his subject and goes over the material in depth.  While exams are tough (this is physics, after all), the course is more than worth it-I learned more from him than from any prof I've had so far. Thumbs up!!
                
                   Unless you are willing to put all your time in this class, don't count on making an A. Homework is hard but he could care less if you attend lecture or not. I suggest you just go to 4.0 to learn the material.
                
                   He seems like a nice guy, but he does an awful job at covering the material. The book is helpful I've heard, but I didn't buy it. I pay 4.0 and go for tutoring, if it weren't for that I would have failed this class long ago. BIGGEST THING IS HE DOES NOT DO EXAMPLES IN CLASS, LIKE EVER. He does a review the lecture before the test, but that's all. 
                
                   You have to work your tail off. I worked 10+ hours a week to maintain an A. Tests are very hard, even tutoring doesn't reliably get you a high grade. The only reason I did well is because other people had more trouble than I did. Nice guy, but bad lectures. Research is more his thing. Try to get Ford. If that fails, get the student answer book. 
                
                   Toughest tests ever.  He had good reviews but seriously, I dont know why. Take someone else! 
                
                   ok prof, easy test...
                
                   PHYS218 sucks in general, the class is super difficult though  -class lectures don't help on the difficult online homework -clicker questions everyday, so go to class -the common exams suck so it's not really his fault -easily understandable, nice in office hours
                
                   He is a nice professor but I just felt that the types of problems he taught us in class were the easiest of the ones in the book. The tests problems were way harder than the one's he ever showed us in class, and I felt unprepared. I had to teach myself from textbook all the material in the class.  He is very responsive to emails and nice though.
                
                   Hard course, but great teacher. Knows his stuff and knows how to teach it. His classes are enjoyable. He made me really like this course. I wish I could have him for every science. 
                
                   He's clear and keeps lectures entertaining. He' clear and concise when explaining concepts and works lots of practice problems in class. By far the best physics lecturer I've had. Test are hard because they are common exams but his class scores higher than the average score across all of the lectures of all physics 218 professors. 
                
                   Keith is a great prof! He really cares if the students are doing well. He is good at explaining the conceptual ideas and uses the class participation to make sure the students understand. The students really respect him, and he grades things fairly. Tests are challenging, but I would definitely recommend prof Ulmer for this class!
                
                   He really cares about the class and tries to get the students to participate, so he can gauge the general understanding of the class.
                
                   I really enjoyed Professor Ulmer's class, he really seems like he cares if we are doing okay in the class and understanding everything. He teaches things to where it makes sense, but still do the pre-lectures and homework. He really helps with clarification. Working through the homeworks is the best way to study for the tests. 
                
                   He is very sincere and really gives off a vibe of caring about his students.  It's an introductory course, so the sections are large, but he will still do as much as he can to be sure that you understand the material. He also works at CERN so that's pretty neat.
                
                   I like him as a person nice guy and lame funny jokes but when it comes to teaching he goes over stuff like how to get the formula he doesnt do problems sometimes pointless to go to class. I would suggest not taking this professor
                
                   He was a good professor, always willing to work with you. He was willing to flex his office hours for you if you asked. Anything that wasn't clear in lecture, he would clarify in office hours. Very nice fellow. 
                
                   Doctor Wu is a terrible teacher in general, when he tries to explain things its not only hard to understand but not helpful to the subject he is trying to teach. He is very excited about the  material, but cannot explain it for the life of him. If you are taking his course the book will be the only thing you will learn from and youtube, good luck.
                
                   I struggled in this class but that's because mechanics in general is pretty tough. I always attended his office hours and he was always willing to help. He's a great professor and I don't think his accent is bad at all. The textbook is a must have! READ IT AND DO PRACTICE PROBLEMS BEFORE GOING TO LECTURE.
                
                   He's a little tough to understand at times, but he doesn't assign any homework and  he will help you the best he can as long as you ask for it. Also he does quizzes every lecture to take attendance, not a huge part of your grade but if you are border line the quizzes may help.
                
                   Only 3 tests and a final. Don't miss class.
                
                   This man does not know how to teach. If you have had an AP physics course prior, you MIGHT do well. He tests you over things that were covered briefly in class. I went to tutoring, read the book, and basically let this class consume my life and I still for a D. DO NOT TAKE HIM!!!
                
                   There is no point in attending his lectures. He knows the subject, he just doesn't know how to teach. Highest fail rate of all physics professors. I do no reccommend him.
                
                   Great Professor.  You still have to work at this class, it is not easy material.  I think Dr. Youngblood presents it in a way anyone can understand if they want to.
                
                   Dr. C is extremely intelligent, funny, and a wonderful teacher! I was very disappointed to  hear he is no longer teaching some of his regular classes. I have noticed some students, who don't have a strong math background, rank him poorly. The subject can be challenging, but he is extremely helpful and welcomes questions even after class.
                
                   Dr. Chourasia is VERY intelligent, he's a guy you can learn so many things from. Physics 1401 is reviewed material, but physics in general is a fairly challenging class. You will have to study for this class, but I feel like I've learned so much just from being in the class. All the tests are curved at the end of the year. I recommend Dr. Chourasia
                
                   Tests are really hard, knowing the formulas would have been helpful. He's sometimes hard to understand when he talks.
                
                   He's not good at teaching. Makes things very difficult and much harder when teaching concepts. Yahoo Answers helped me more than he did. Long homework, tests which are EXTREMELY hard, definitely a weed-out class. Make sure you know formulas. Asks questions about unexplained topics and won't continue until someone answers which is annoying...
                
                   Physics I was a walk in the park compared to Physics II. Dr. Chourasia is extremely knowledgeable and, for the most part, pretty clear. However, this class involves so much. You had to memorize everything up until the final. Material is extremely complicated! Practice/review every day otherwise you'll fall behind and be lost completely. Good luck.
                
                   Not a very fun class. Liked the Professor though
                
                   good
                
                   One of the most challenging classes I have had but I learned alot.  If you attempt the homework and then go to his office he has no objection to helping you out.
                
                   I have enjoyed my science classes until this prof.. I must agree with previous posts, the man can not be understood and he is not willing to help you. Do not take this course unless you already know the material, he is not recommended!!
                
                   You can't understand the man! When you ask for help he acts like you're an idiot & should know how to do it already.
                
                   He knows alot about Physics and once you get passed his accent, you can learn alot in this class. But this class is hard but it would be with any professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is by far the best teacher I have ever had. He is very smart and knows his material. He is very helpful and not bad to look at.
                
                   Pay attention to his reviews and talk to him as much as possible. The more involved you are the easier the A is for his class. LOVE this teacher!
                
                   He brings a lot of upper level physics into a non-science major class, making it VERY hard to understand. Attendance was never taken. He rambles the entire class. Save yourself the headache and don't take this class.
                
                   He gets off topic a bit but does a good job of making the subject interesting by doing so.
                
                   Is very intelligent, but has no idea how to teach students who are not physics geniuses.  Spends most of the class rambling...  This class was an exercise in frustration.  The curve on the first exam was 30 points.  That should be a hint as to how much students in this class are learning.  His teaching style needs to be seriously modified.
                
                   A very uninteresting and disorganized professor.  Strongest attribute is the generous curve given on exams and final grade.  Students earn a good grade with minimal effort.
                
                   Was in this class because he was not the teacher. Ended up seeing him in the front of class. Had him previous semester. So I knew that I did not want him as a teacher. He is really smart and does a lot of labs in class. Should be lab teacher, lecture wise, he does not teach.
                
                   very enthusiastic but DOES NOT TEACH did not learn a THING had to drop the class
                
                   Interesting professor!  Very willing to work with students and really listens to the class.  Should be in charge of labs more.  Recommended!
                
                   He is so nice and really smart, but has a hard time teaching at beginning level. But he does curve (a lot).
                
                   if you show up and half way try he wont fail you the lowest grade he'll give is C.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Richards does not teach physics.  He gets distracted and lectures over topics that are not within the scope of the class.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS TEACHER! He is awful, he does not know ONE thing about teaching, he has no common sense whatsoever. I am almost done with the semester and I do not know one thing about Integrated Science. He gives us HARD homework that he doesnt even explain how to do. Do not waste your time, take another teacher.
                
                   I have to say that I didn't know what we were discussing half the time, but as we got closer to the tests and term paper he started to get better and talk in a way that we could understand it. I can tell he really likes teaching, but it was usually hard to follow.It's a really easy class. The test is easy and the paper if you put forth the effort.
                
                   THe man is an Idiot! well i guess he is just to smart for his qwn good! doesnt stay on topic and is very monotone! he should stick with physics and not try to teach IS!!
                
                   He doesn't teach.  He doesn't even discuss 90% of the material until the day before the test.  Not only is he boring, but he's in love with the sound of his voice.  But the class is so easy, it's still easy to get an A.  I usually studied for other classes while he lectured.
                
                   Boring beyond belief.  He doesn't stay on topic and he's in love with himself.
                
                   I liked his class because I think he was bored by IS so he talked about quantum physics all the time. Also, you aren't penalized much for absenses. Minds when people talk, but only after they've been talking so long they are an obvious distraction. Plus, he looks just like Al off of home improvement
                
                   Dr. Richards is a great teacher! You just have to try and if you don't plan to then don't take his class. If you will just put forth some effort you can pass with an easy &quot;A&quot;. Gets quite upset when students don't do work/pay attention.  Can u bl
                
                   When he actually teaches he is not very clear.  Most of the lectures are not on topic and stupid.  But, the tests come straight from the reviews.  And, he kept to the syllabus, which was indepth.
                
                   He is very funny during the lectures, but gets ticked off when people talk a lot in class.  His tests come straight from the review he gives the class. I haven't even used my book.
                
                   He is a fantastic teacher.  I even changed my certification to teach both math and science.  The only thing I did not like is that he isn't always clear.  Instead of breaking things down into very simple clear explanations, he will make a large explanations that sometimes come out confusing.
                
                   This professor is so good.  He is the only one teaching IS at A&M, that I am aware of.  He wants everyone to do well and to understand.  There are not many notes to take.  He e-mails a lot.  The book is cheap, it is copies of paper that you pay for and put into a notebook.  He is the BEST teacher EVER!!
                
                   He is very knowedgeable and wants to make sure EVERYONE understands everything.  He wants input and will listen to your suggestions.  He wants everyone to do well in his class as well.
                
                   Tough material, but a good teacher.  Stay focused!
                
                   Lectures can be boring, especially during derivations. Doesn't do a whole lot of examples, but take his problem solving class and you'll be fine. I really enjoyed him as a professor, and he was always encouraging students because he knew how hard the class can be. Did everything he could to help students when they asked. Very knowledgeable.
                
                   All he does in class is show you how to derive all the formulas. Never shows examples from the textbook. If you want to know how to solve them you'll need to teach yourself. Going to drop the course and hope for a better professor. DO NOT TAKE!!
                
                   This professor is extremely knowledgable and can convey difficult material in a way that is easily understood.
                
                   Dr. Bala has a rock solid grasp on the concepts required to teach this class. He also explained complex subjects slowly and clearly, encouraging students to participate in a discussion by answering his open questions. I approached Dr. Bala several times with general physics questions and he was more than eager to go over any physics topic I wished.
                
                   Dr. Bala is an excellent professor overall. If you like topics/subjects explained very plainly, matter-of-fact, Dr. Bala is for you. He doesn't spend a lot of time like many professors stumbling around with useless data. If he presents something, you should assume it's necessary. I recommend taking Dr. Bala if you care about learning.
                
                   I took this class from Tarleton State. It was taught using interactive TV. He is an extremely knowledgeble professor. His lectures were interesting and clear, and I could follow in a few minutes what I did not understand after hours of reading the book. His exams were difficult and the homework long and time consuming.
                
                   Best professor I have had, very difficult assignments, but explains everything so well that they are manageable. He curves heavily as well.
                
                   Just came out of Exam 1. Good questions. You are ready if you worked on the quizzes yourself, not if you always got tutor's help. Really great professor, well informed and humorous.
                
                   Extremely good and thorough. enjoyed the class very much. He makes you think. Course requires persistent hard work.
                
                   The best professor I ever had. Uses notes but not text books. Very helpful in assisting with quizzes. Expects high level of motivation and problem solving abilities.
                
                   Physics the hardway.  Bala wants students to really master physics.  He makes it hard but does offer extra credit.
                
                   Balas a smart man and teaches his class assuming his students are also smart and/or willing to work hard.  He could make his class more straight forward i.e., write his own homework problems and teach and test his class based on those examples.  He curves the class considerably and gives plenty of chances to earn extra credit.  Physics 1 I got an A
                
                   Tests are ridiculous. I spent most of my time guessing--got 5/12 on most tests--which isn't an awful grade in Bala's class. Go to CASA for the quizzes, the tutors will help you out, especially Shehryar. Just keep going and you'll pass--I pulled a C and I didn't really study much (was taking two other math classes at the same time!).
                
                   If you want to take his class, then you have to have some experience with physics. Otherwise, you'll have to teach yourself which will be time-consuming and almost impossible since you'll be busy with your other classes. He can't teach and he's all over the place. Ask him a question and he'll just confuse you more. Sometimes he doesn't even answer 
                
                   This class is flat out ridiculous. Make sure you do well on the quizzes. Be prepared to spend your entire semester in the tutoring center.
                
                   Here's the deal. He will make you work. He does not appreciate students who want to be told answers. He teaches to the top of the class (his words) so that no one is unchallenged. I struggled mightily, having little math background, but gained more than avg. If you are humble, he is extremely kind and helpful. No room for pride in his classroom.
                
                   Do all of the quizzes by yourself or in SMALL groups. After spending many hours struggling on quizzes, his tests seemed like a joke. 15 questions, only 12 gets you a 100. If you got through the quizzes it is easy to get 15 right (125 on tests grades) Even if you don't, there is tons of extra credit. Anyone who did poor did so because they are lazy.
                
                   Bala refuses to answer questions in lecture. What more needs to be said&#63; Teachers should bother to teach, not stand in front of a class and work through problems and expect students to fully understand phys concepts. Lab with him is tolerable but still the only redeeming part of this class was the extra credit, otherwise 75% of students would fail.
                
                   Horrible. There were times he didn't show up for class because he was too busy attending a meeting or WHATEVER! Doesn't teach and doesn't help at all. Try to get Parmley if you can.
                
                   Taking his class is like taking a math-intensive class when you aren't a math person.  Trust me.  You have to put in the work to understand difficult concepts.  Don't complain when you get a bad grade but are a lazy student.  He's open to answering questions after and outside of class.  Getting a cal-based physics textbook helps a bunch.
                
                   Awesome teacher, totally clear and willing to help!!
                
                   I took two courses with Dr. Bala(Physics I and II) and he was always willing to help me after class, office hours, and even via email.   If you take his class, be prepared to work hard, take a lot of quizzes, and supplement your studying. He's difficult, but I had no problems with this.
                
                   He's kind of crazy but it's funny to watch. Make sure you read each lab before class or you won't know what's going on. He has a bit of a temper and not too patient, so he has a tendency to rush. But don't be afraid to ask him to explain problems because he will clear things up and it helps a lot. Most people make A.
                
                   Parmley is hilarious yet thorough.  He does a great job of explaining labs.  I'll miss him as a lab instructor.
                
                   Yeah, I am not sure what everyones problem is with Spirko. I have had both him and Reid and both go above and beyond to help their students. He does get side tracked during lecture, but at least its interesting and relevant.  His tests aren't that bad. The hard parts are the concept questions since the math parts are usually repeats of old HW. 
                
                   He's a good professor. People are cry babies and don't understand simple math. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE! This instructor is condescending towards students and often gets sidetracked with unimportant topics. He will say several times in his lectures that he is "odd" but a more descriptive words are "pompous, boorish, and arrogant." He does his whole lecture by writing on paper with black pen while projecting the results (extremely mundane)
                
                   This professor is AWEFUL! I do not recommend anyone take this instructor. I have over 60 courses under my belt and have had a wide range of professors- not exaggerating, this instructor is the WORST! No powerpoints for lecture, no lecture prepared, he simply walks into class and asks if there are any questions. Explains theory with no examples.
                
                   Taking him now, expecting an A. Uni Phys 1 is tough, you must pickup effective problem solving habits fast. Spirko's lectures are mostly boring, his demonstrations are interesting though. I HIGHLY recommend meeting with him if you need help with homework. Put serious effort to understand the HW problems, ask him questions if you don't understand.
                
                   Absolutely terrible professor, My least favorite on campus. Does not explain well in class and refuses to do example problems with actual numbers rather than theoretical.
                
                   Spirko doesn't know how to teach. He goes off topic very often and ends up losing his train of thought. When/If you ask questions and he thinks it's a stupid question,he will mock you or respond in a very unprofessional way. When explaining he will often say he doesn't know if the answer is correct and he will advise you to check at home
                
                   Professor did not do a good job of explaining the material. He did not give many examples, and mainly derived answers from formulas. Making the whole learning process very confusing. He didn't prepare you for the tests. Learned a lot better in the lab where the material could be explained very well. Still didn't make a difference on the tests.
                
                   Spirko has an inability to communicate the subject, while wasting time with non-related issues. When students ask relevant questions, he mocks them and returns with some quip that isn't funny nor professional. I learned the material from the lab professor who should be teaching the class. I got an A in lab, but C overall. Wait to take someone else.
                
                   Hardly introduces the new chapters asks you to read them and for questions. If you did not read there will be no questions and hardly any discussion and examples shown. Doesn't introduce the new chapters in a way someone w/ limited physics knowledge could understand easily
                
                   Lectures are confusing. He post them online but they do not include any of the math(which is the important part. The book is almost exclusively text and very difficult to follow.
                
                   he doesnt explain well, gets mad when you ask questions or dont understand something. he expects you to know calculus and doesnt care if you don't.
                
                   Refused to answer questions and assumed we already knew math that wasn't a prerec
                
                   He obviously knows what he's talking about, but he really doesn't present it in a way that is understandable to those who didn't take AP physics in high school. The 2 tests are ridiculous and 2-4 questions long and NEVER multiple choice. The final was 9 questions long and over 16 chapters.  I honestly had to get a tutor.
                
                   Class isn't necessarily too hard, but the quizzes are 2 questions and the exams are 3 questions that cover between 4-5 chapters.  Grading is outrageous either get everything right, or fail.. little partial credit. DO NOT recommend.
                
                   No one understands what he is talking about in the lectures. Do the homework and study the practices tests. Ask the tutor to explain what he said in class and you will be fine. Go to class everyday to complete the all the quizzes he gives.
                
                   He is easy and a good teacher. Just don't be an idiot, you show know algebra very well for this class.
                
                   Hite gives lectures not from the book, but from his head so you can try to get stuff from the book, but his derivations won't really be in the book, they are from him. His tests seem easy at first, but you'll realize that some of them involve his crazy derivations and you'll just end up being lost on the problem. GO TO TUTORIALS!!
                
                   Attending lecture is a waste of your time, he writes small and never stops. He makes up problems as he goes leaving you relatively confused, but you have to show up because of random end-of-class quizzes. The course itself is definitely manageable, as long as you do the online homework and look at his old tests. 
                
                   Dr Hite is incredibly knowledgeable. He gives almost all of his lectures off of the top of his head and is hardly ever wrong. If you have any questions he will help you.   He loves proving things on the board and his proofs are almost always an incomprehensible series of massive crazy integrals.
                
                   he seems to know  the course well, but his teaching is very very very confusing. He starts the class by writing on the board with very small font size and keeps on talking talking talking and writing writing writing, until the class ends and leave students taking picture of the board with their cell phones. Class is a waste of time.
                
                   Much better than Klein!! He is a lot easier to understand and doesn't go the backwards way of explaining things when you ask a question. Just do the homework and show up for class and you will pass
                
                   Very easy prof. Do Mastering Physics homework, get a hold of old exams, you'll be fine.
                
                   His handwriting is  very hard to read and he isn't a very good teacher, despite being very knowledgeable about physics. Also he puts old test on file that would be easy to do, but are pointless to go over since they do not prepare you for his real test which is insanely  difficult and based on mastering physics which is acceptable only as homework.
                
                   His test r rough but they follow his practice test fairly well, know that by heart. MAKE SURE U DO THE MASTERING PHYSICS HOMEWORK AND UNDERSTAND IT. Thats key
                
                   Classes were hard to follow because he was never as prepared as he could have been. He certainly knows his stuff, but he was not the best at teaching it. All the homework is online and pop quizzes at class. Also, the tests were fair, but i do not recommend this class because I feel like there could be better.
                
                   I was actually looking to see what anyone else thought of this teacher, and was surprised to see that he's not rated. I find him to be difficult and would be intersted to see what others think.
                
                   I hate Riddle. He is terrible at grading, and by terrible, i mean he is just way too picky at what he wants. His tests are easy if you know you have a test that day. Multiple times he didn't tell us we would have one.
                
                   This guy is awesome!  Acts like one of the students.  Easy if you pay attention but really hard if you can't figure out his report format.
                
                   I have Butterworth at WTAMU for Physics 2 and he is without a doubt the worse professor I have ever had or probably will have. His class is ridiculously hard and he does not explain things well to a student in introductory physics. Do not take him. He offers no help when asked via email or in person in class. 
                
                   At westtam  Not a good experience at all
                
                   this guy really discouraged me from pursuing engineering. i transferred to UT and had an easier time in physics and got more clarity and help. glad i was able to leave kingsville and this horribly run department.
                
                   Avoid him for physics.
                
                   Horrible teacher. Don't take him take karna or hewiit.
                
                   MAde me change my major. I tried so hard to get a passing grade. studied so much and went to his office hours for help, but he just can't get over his own intelligence. Tries to confuse studnts on tests and grades so hard that if you get the right answer he takes off points for bad work or if you did all the work right he takesoff for the wrong ans
                
                   Not a good Professor. VERY arrogant ans stuck up. Can care less for trying and only wants to confuse students. Exams are 10x harder than class problems.
                
                   I graduated as an engineer from TAMUK and I would have to say this is one of my favorite classes I took. Butterworth is a good teacher. He will educate you if you try in the class and want to learn something about physics. I myself think if I pay for a class I want to learn something not just given an A in the class.
                
                   Do not take this teacher for physics 1. Did not learn AYTHING and SI was useless. TA only helped on one test but butterworth stopped that for the next three tests. Hewitt may have more homework but his TA gives good Si sessions. Butterworth just tries to sound really smart and trick you on exams. I had to change majors because of this guy. Worst ex
                
                   Not a good teacher. Tries to trick you tests. Avoid physics at TAMUK. Does not care about students.
                
                   Butterworth and Hewitt have created one of the worst physics departments in the history of this school. It's TAMUK and is filled with incompetent students that need to be taught at their level, not bombarded with flagship level tests and homeworks.  Butterworth cares less about his students and more about sounding smart and confusing his students.
                
                   Really nice guy, and knows the physics well. Teaches pretty good too, although some times it gets hard to understand. Will help you during office hours if you go. All tests are open book/ notes, but they're still challenging. Not too much homework, about 1 assignment a week. Does take roll every class so you do have to show up.
                
                   Good natured guy, really gets into lectures. Isn't the easiest to understand at times, but overall its a basic physics course that is not hard if you show up every class.
                
                   Dr. Karna is a great teacher. He has a bit of an accent but it's doable. The test are the same as the homework. Make sure you do the homework that messed me up big time.  Also don't use your cell phone in class he doesn't like it. 
                
                   Dr. Karna is by far the best physics professor in the department!  He genuinely cares about his students and tries his best to help them understand the material.  He also has an excellent sense of humor. I enjoyed his class very much. His accent took some getting used to but he tries really hard to help you understand him. 
                
                   Mrs. Nelson is a great teacher.  She was hired on nearly halfway into the semester and although she teaches from Dr. Hewitt's book, she teaches it in the most simplified way.   She really is there to help you learn. Attend the study sessions she holds prior to class.   Homework is not hard, as its based off her lectures.  She made physics 2 fun.
                
                   SHE IS A HORRIBLE TEACHER, DO NOT TAKE HER
                
                   Has strong accent. Must pay very close attention to follow along, however very humorous. I would recommend her over the other professor in Physics.
                
                   He was a great lecturer but the class was hard. Don't expect to just go to class and pass. You NEED to do all the homework problems as they draw heavily on those for the test. Overall he was a likable guy
                
                   Brilliant professor. His accent doesn't get in the way and he is pretty clear in his explanations. He is very helpful in his office hours and is very interested in helping you do well. He does curve in the end but midterms are hard and doesn't curve those. If you do the homework and do extra problems on your own you'll do pretty well in his class.
                
                   Good prof, hard class. Has an accent, but is easy to understand and pretty charming. Go to lectures, do the Mastering Physics, be engaged during recitation, and attend tutoring of any kind. Seriously. There is no such thing as over-studying for a test in this class.
                
                   He's good at getting his point across and his accent was easy to understand. The tests get increasingly harder, but don't panic too much because there will be a curve at the end of semester. There are random clicker quizzes during lecture so make sure you get your clicker early and always come to class; those points add up!
                
                   He goes into great detail the exact way to solve problems. Asks for feedback and is responsive to questions. Genuinely cares about the class. Occasionally funny.
                
                   Didn't do well on my first two tests in his class so it's been a struggle to pass. His accent isn't impossible to understand. Often he works through a problem too quickly and assumes everybody understands what he is teaching. Not an easy class.
                
                   Although I hated the warm-up exercises, they did help during the course.  He follows the syllabus, and if you have questions he takes time to address them.  Good professor, I recommend.
                
                   Easy professor. Write 10 pages of homework and read the material just a little bit, you gat an A. Nice thing is that, if you just make 30 out of 60, you are A coz top 10 % of your class should be A no matter they score 10 or 20. So, be cool. I very very highly recommend this professor, just to get an A.
                
                   He doesn't know anything, not at all. But, if u take Physics and evenif we know nothing, you are A student. I recommend to take him just forstraight A, not for concept and knowledge.
                
                   Physics is a tough subject as it is, but Hewitt is probably the best teacher to take both courses in. The homework is a lot but if you actually do your 10/15 pages of what is expected of you, the tests should be fairly easy. He does give big curves on the exams. Just show up, listen and take notes, and do all your homework and you will pass.
                
                   He gives a lot of homework, and sometimes he allows notecards on tests. Overall, you will learn from him, but don't expect an A unless you really really work for it. Otherwise expect a B if you do the homework, and a C if you don't. If you miss class, it will be difficult to pass. He's funny, and has his quirks but he's the best Physics professor.
                
                   The homework load is a lot, but essential to pass the class. Taking this class via TTVN kinda sucked though. 
                
                   He really is the best physics professor at Tamuk. He still let's you use as many notecards as you want during tests and his 10 pages of he is really just 10 pages of whatever you want. The homework can be examples, made up problems, and even examples from his book. You can put anything physics related. You learn a lot from his classes and they are a lot of fun!
                
                   10 pages of problems due for every class period (including exam days) is a lot; however, I don't think I would have done well on my tests if it weren't for the homework. He makes the class fun and is very enjoyable to have as a professor. He let's you use a notecard on tests. He gives points based on how much physics you know, not on your math. For example, if you write down every equation that you will need for that problem, you will get majority of the points regardless of correct answer.
                
                   Difficult class no matter who you take it with, but you will enjoy and learn it the most with Dr.Hewitt. Dr.Hewitt goes over everything in Physics I from Equilibrium to Thermodynamics so be prepared to study totally different concepts every couple of weeks or so. His tests can be difficult but gives a very fair curve.
                
                   Though the material was at times tough, I enjoyed studying Physics with Dr. Hewitt (a helluva lot better than Cambell).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great Professor.  Thanks for the lessons on accoustics.  His class is hard by nature, but he makes it very interesting...
                
                   He is a good teacher but he likes to fly through new material, this makes it hard because you have learn it by doing his endless demand of 10 page plus of homework.
                
                   easy tests, great curve; however he is not going to let future physics I. students use notecards on tests.  Without notecard tests would be tough.  Remember to write all equations for every problem on test sheet and you will get at least a C on every test gaurenteed.
                
                   Great professor!  If you have to take astronomy or physics -- this is your man!  Fun and educational!
                
                   The instructor is exceptionally intelligent and therefore holds students to the level that he holds himself.  It is very difficult to get an A and his grading is VERY detailed.  Be ware of all the details you write on homework and tests - whole points are taken off.
                
                   The grading method used in Dr Cox's class is awful don't expect an A because he doesn't believe in "grade inflation" and the lab he coordinates don't even take that!Because an A is a dream in his lab course.. He will cut points on your exam if you didn't exceed his expectations (which are exceedingly high) you so much as forget one unit u fail:(
                
                   Honest reviewer here, Everyone elses comments are true.
                
                   Look, Dr. Cox is a good guy, but he's horrible in the Physics labs. He instructs his Lab Assistants to give nothing higher than an 89 or they are in trouble. This scares them (They are Indian) & makes them give C's to everyone in the lab, regardless of how good the report is. Everyone cheats in the lab, which is sad because some don't & still fail.
                
                   Dr.Cox is one of those professors where you need to be SELF MOTIVATED to get anything out of his classes. Ex: if your new in physics he is the WORST choice for you but if your BATTLE HARDEN VETERAN in physics he is one of the best choices. My only problem was he doesn't assign enough homework and or grades them on time other than that he is good.
                
                   I did not understand this proffesor at all, I did not learn anything and this is the first C I ever make, don't take him, he is very difficult to understand.
                
                   It would be nice if it were even possible to make an A. Never learned anything from him. Take Kinnison or Allison at least for a chance to learn physics. He does not give A's to anyone.
                
                   This guy is amazingly smart...unfortunately class was a mountain to climb! They should require us to know a LOT more before going into his class.  I was lost from day one - and I'm otherwise a straight-A student.  I will say, he's so nice and helpful in his office. Avoid his class unless you're a physics major or great at physics - then he's great!
                
                   Worst teacher ever. Do not take him. I don't care how smart you are. You'll regret it.
                
                   just so you know all these people are being sarcastic apparently... being a jerk is ok being a hard teacher is ok.... but his expectations.... just don't expect to pass if you take it and you are not a physics major
                
                   Awesome proffy. Expect to work for your grade and spend plenty of time on homework. Know your homework problems backwards and forwards in preparation for the exams and even quizzes...&quot;anybody&#63; anybody&#63;&quot;
                
                   Cox's PHYS 1305 is the best Physics class taught in the whole world. If you take that class you will never forget the fundamentals of physics and learn the art of problem solving. His quizzes test your basic skills. If you can get an A in Dr. Cox's class, you can safely assume that you are of Harvard and MIT calibre. His classes are boring though !
                
                   I saw Cox for my lab PHYS 2125 instead of Kinnison. He was EXTREMELY helpful to me in understanding the labs and what I was supposed to do. Since seeing Cox for lab instruction, I have been getting A's on lab reports. Don't just listen to these other students' opinion. Investigate for yourselves. He was way more helpful and explicit than Kinnison.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   GOOD, HELPFUL, SMART AND HARD. BE CAUTIOUS. HE WAS OK FOR ME BUT MAY NOT BE FOR EVERYONE.
                
                   so &quot;easy&quot; and great professor, I &quot;highly&quot; recommend.
                
                   He is the best professor I have ever seen. I highly recommend to take him. He is simply wonderful. He knows whole a lot of things that we can not imagine. He is simply wonderful.
                
                   he is extra ordinary but still wonder why he is here. he should not teach the student he should teach other of his level. he teach in high level high that other  professors also felt hard to understand. i think he should retire from teaching life and start his own research(crazy) i suggest other not to take his class if u took my mistake drop it...
                
                   Worst professor in this planet and beyond.
                
                   Dr. Cox is the most boring human being on the planet. Plus he thinks he is like a super professor. He treats you like an idiot for not knowing something, but yet the purpose of college is to learn right&#63; He is a really bad teacher, he babbles on and on about things that do not even have an consequence to the class. Avoid him at all costs. unless of course you want you head to implode after his first lecture........ What is he looking at when he looks up at the roof and moves his eyebrows anyway&#63;&#63;&#63;
                
                   Cox does not cover the book material.  He frequently spends whole (hour and 15 min.) class periods on one problem.  Purposely tries to confuse you on homework and tests.  Only one guy got a B in the class, everyone else was lower; no A's.
                
                   I didn't take him for a class; however he was very helpfull and curtious when I had a question and couldn't reach my own professor. He explained my problems well to me so I new how to answer them.  He is a great teacher to have you questions helped with.
                
                   Best professor ever. Exams are easy. 6 exams (including the final) drops the lowest test. Exams are exactly like the reviews. No quizzes no midterms.
                
                   Easy A. Exams are just like the HW. The hardest part of this class is not getting bored, he does take attendance. Labs are boring, long, and easy.Take it if your not a science major, or if you want a GPA booster
                
                   Just look up the homework on google questions come right up. Dont BUY the BOOK don't need it Easy A
                
                   Boring class, hard to stay awake. Exams are exactly like reviews. Boring but easy labs.
                
                   SLOW PROFESSOR DOES NOT REQUIRE ATTENDENCE EXAMS ARE THE SAME AS REVIEW AND GIVES ANSWERS FOR REVIEWS. LABS ARE BORING!
                
                   I took this prof. for PHYS201 and currently for PHYS202. It is PHYSICS... I respect him because he is trying his best to help students succeed but he does not the work for US. While giving the lectures, he gives examples, for me it is enough to learn the concept. The homeworks are a bit more difficult but helpful. In brief: I love it.
                
                   Best Professor I've had of 34.  quick responses to e-mails, very helpful, tracks student and class progress through bar graphs, predicts outcome of class and individual performance, reasonable homework, (internet quizzes), good study reference for exams.
                
                   Dr. Tissot is an amazing teacher. He will stay after or come early just so you can understand his lesson. He is very passionate and makes learning fun. Wonderful teacher I highly recommend him!
                
                   Great teacher.  I really enjoyed his class.  He is interested in what he teaches, and it shows!  He is very helpful if you ever go to him for help!
                
                   Awesome teacher he is one of my favorites
                
                   Great teacher he was one of my favorite teachers :)
                
                   One of the best professors I've had.  He is fantastic!  He has students listen to the instruction for the first half of the class, then fun labs are done for the second half.  He's great at what he does and if you put a little effort, there's no reason why you shouldn't make an A in his class.  MUCH better than Reid.
                
                   Took this as a summer class a couple years ago. She still remains my favorite professor. Class was always interesting and the labs were fun!
                
                   use more blackboard
                
                   This Professor is terrible. He is a brilliant person and loves the subject but cannot teach at all. He flies through the text and only covers theory leaving you to teach yourself for all his ridiculously long/difficult homework.
                
                   This man is brilliant but has no clue how to teach a class. I used a combination of the book and the Internet to teach me the material, and I spent all my free time doing his ridiculously long homework.
                
                   Even though I made an A in this class, I would still say this teacher is not very good. I did not learn very much in this class and the only reason I did well is because of prior knowledge. Dr. Bogucki is very smart however, he cannot teach.
                
                   Good
                
                   terrible lectture notes. a lot of irrelevant material.
                
                   I'm admittedly confounded by the topic, however the teacher strives to keep things interesting.He's not the most professional instructor, but that makes him less intimidating. Arrogance has little to do with whether or not a person can learn in a classroom. It is up to the student to learn.
                
                   He's a good teacher. He doesn't really care about being to exact and sometimes goes a little slow but he covers the material. I took this class in the summer and it never seemed like the class drug on. It was a good class.
                
                   He's okay at explaining basic concepts, but not good at preparing you for the homework or exam. He is very rude at times and needlessly calls out people. The textbook is a joke, and going to his class is pointless unless there's a bonus credit opportunity. Yahoo Answers! will be your friend throughout this course for the quizzes.
                
                   Dr. Benson was not a bad nor good professor. The only assignments were quizzes and labs which the quizzes are done online. He doesn't teach the class really, all he does is go over physics problems which are suppose to help you with the quizzes and sometimes do. I recommend getting another teacher for physics.
                
                   Easiest university physics teacher!  Works plenty of problems in class and has simple grading policy.  Do your HW and do well in lab, and you'll get an A!
                
                   Horrible, that's all I have to say.  He is difficult to understand and when the class doesn't understand something he looks at us as if we are retarded. Last semester he made us write a computer program, his excuse was because it was good for us, WHATEVER! If you have to take University Physics I or II, brace yourself.
                
                   Horrible. Talked about death of animals a lot (like him and his wife strangling birds). Near the end of the semester, he practically forced the class to create a computer program. If I wanted to create programs, I'd be in a computer programing class. This is supposed to be physics! He is always off topic and never helps.
                
                   This is the worst teacher ever. He told us day one that his job was not to teach us. He talked more about his military experience than physics. He does not care about teaching or does not care about the students. He is more than likely burned out and should quit.
                
                   Dr. Benson has been one of the most useless teachers i have ever had.  He doesn't teach, he just expects you to understand everything that he does during the lecture or you're screwed if you don't. Benson offers no help and doesn't care about the students.  he is arrogant and he knows it.
                
                   I think I probably just had class with whomever reviewed on 7/8/07, and I couldn't disagree more. Yes, he calls people out in class, but he's a fantastic physics TEACHER that has a way of making a traditionally hard class into something that's not nearly as prone to making you chain-chug bottles of aspirin. Would love to take him again.
                
                   Dr. Benson is the worst teacher I have ever had in college. He believes in embarassing students for his sick personal insecurities. He doesn't think he should teach the class, and he doesn't offer help outside of class. He has no office hours and would rather we read physics books ourself, but doesn't issue any text book. Very unprofessional!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. West is a genuine good guy.  Not only is he extremely well-versed in his field and willing to help you out in any way possible, but he is down-to-earth and fun to talk to.  Although I cared very little for the material presented in class, I still have to give this man an A+.
                
                   Very helpful and knows what he is talking about.
                
                   One of the best teachers I've ever had.  Almost considered adding a major until I realized I probably wouldn't be taking much if any from him after that.
                
                   Has an intense personality-Speaks in a dramatic tone of voice which people sometimes misinterpret-He is not really as strict or intimidating as he seems, its a habit he picked up when he taught high school-Thought I was doing poorly in his class but did well-Made an A when I deserved a B, made a B when I deserved a C-Gives alot of partial credit
                
                   AMAZING TEACHER! each class was interesting and the expierements were awesome. he made science fun and he made you science notebook useful. I have been teaching for 4 years and have reflected on that notebook every year.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. West is very helpful.  If you don't understand something, you only have to catch him during office hours and ask.  He is strict, but fair.  Don't make him mad, and don't ask questions that prove you haven't read the book.
                
                   Best professor I've ever had. Breaks down the material to an understandable level, and is incredibly helpful after class with homework. He's very strict, but totally fair. I highly recommend taking your intro physics courses with him.
                
                   Cool!  Dr. West is an awesome teacher!  Took summer class and it was intense, but you will learn with Dr. West!  Recommended!!  A++
                
                   great guy, makes physics interesting and fun.Not hard and makes explaninations in algebra level instead of high math. take his class.
                
                   If you took AP physics you wont have a problem, its all the same. Did not use a textbook. Homework problems can be difficult but tests questions are easy compared to homework. Tests do not have numbers, only variables but once again if you took AP then you know the game. Actually a pretty interesting guy though he researches dark matter on the side
                
                   Test easier than compared to other professors. Some test problems straight from examples or book. Definitely have to work. It is physics though, you have to expect that with any professor.
                
                   The professor is great if you are good in physics. If you're simply not good in physics, you won't understand what he's doing. What he writes on the board will look more like art rather than physics. His test questions are not that difficult compared to other professors.  I only would recommend this professor if you understand the course material.
                
                   The course itself is not very hard; however, this professor makes the problems FAR more difficult than what they need to be.  I used derivatives for over two years and was completely confused when he was trying to explain how to find one.  Easier course, terrible professor.  I recommend a tutoring place if physics does not come easily.
                
                   Great teacher.  Explains things very thoroughly.  My only criticism might be that when working physics examples, he over complicates them by trying to add extra steps to show how to do them.  Very helpful and nice.  No accent.
                
                   You have to got to class because she uses iClickers to take polls which is 15% of your grade. The tests are all fill-in-the-blank and short answer. They aren't too hard because she takes the tests directly from her review given the class before. She offers tons of extra credit that are very easy.
                
                   He is very enthusiastic and eager to help, and his tests are okay, but he gives a lot of difficult homework and his accent makes it hard to learn from him.
                
                   You will not pass all of your tests unless you are a physics wiz. She isn't a good lecturer, very boring and monotone. MUST go to tutoring to get a good grade.
                
                   Physics is so hard in general, but she is a great teacher. Lectures always seem very long, but she makes sure you have an general understanding of what you're doing. Expect a curve. Try your best, and don't get discouraged when you don't make awesome grades.
                
                   Phys 218 just sucks in general. No matter who you take, it's hard. Its a common exam, clicker questions happen every class, but she's cool.
                
                   PHYS 218 is hard just by being PHYS 218. If you want an A, you'll need to do a lot of the book homework problems. Dr. Mio teaches the University Physics textbook and does a lot of examples and clicker questions in class (so helpful!). She's super sweet and helpful if you go to her office hours. Good teacher, hard course. 
                
                   She's very helpful, probably one of the best PHYS 218 on campus here at Texas A&M. Her last name is very intimidating but it's not hard to pronounce at all. She has absolutely no accent so it's easy to understand. She has a lot of patience with students and has a passion for physics. I definitely recommend her. 
                
                   She's a good teacher. She'll help if you ask. She's clear in her lectures. There is a lot of work for this class. Tests are rough. Everyone fails. Lost of homework. And this is probably dependent on your TA but we had a quiz every week in recitation.
                
                   Great Profesor really good at explaining stuff.  A very time demanding class.  Has formula sheets and was helpful at office hours.  I would sign up for any class he taught.
                
                   Prof frequently does nice  gestures like extend homework during the superbowl, hold extra office hours for those of us with tight schedules, and hold weekend reviews. His lectures are great, since they incorporate theory AND examples. Physics is never "blow-off", but he makes sure we learn and enjoy it. Answers e-mails within minutes. Great guy. 
                
                   The reality is Physics 218 is a terrible course and will most likely be difficult no matter who you get. That being said Melconian is an awesome guy and professor and will do his best to explain the material, but you are going to have to learn to teach yourself as well due to the nature of the common exams.
                
                   This is one of the toughest classes I have taken. But Dr. Melconian is by far the best prof to take this class with. His lectures are helpful and full of examples. Would take him again for any physics class.
                
                   He is a genuinely nice guy who cares deeply for his students and whether or not they pass. He is available both in his office hours and about 20 minutes before and after class. His class tends to have the highest averages on the common exams out of all classes, which speaks for itself. He goes fast in lectures, but the examples come from the book.
                
                   I've heard terrible things about physics, and he made it almost easy.  Phenomenal at teaching, very helpful, and he understands that we can struggle with the concepts.
                
                   The best Physics professor you can get. The class will probably be the most difficult class you take hands down. He really does a good job of lightening the mood. He's hilarious and understands that the class is severely hard and that you have other classes you're working hard in. Very good at explaining things clearly and keeping the class engaged
                
                   He is extremely confusing and unclear with his lectures. His tests are not like his lectures or the textbook and you never know what you are going to get. He does not grade things in a timely manner and does not respond to your emails. He really knows his physics, but does not know how to teach it. By far the worst professor I've had at TAMU.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS!!!!!!!! If you have to, beg your advisor to replace it with any other class. Professor's syllabus is pointless. What he talks about in class is confusing and makes no sense and is nothing like what shows up on the tests. Changes due dates and assigns projects out of nowhere. Not helpful at all! Gets mad when you question him.
                
                   His lectures are of little to no help on the homework or tests. The textbook is only slightly more helpful. Outside tutoring is a must if you take his class.
                
                   DO NOT Take!! Worst professor. He is very smart and knows physics but can not teach it. The TA was a better teacher than him. Tests were very hard!
                
                   Cannot teach. Solutions to homework and exams are non existent or incorrect. Be ready to hit the ground running. He expects you to have a knowledge base of material above the prerequisite courses. The course is equivalent to 3 electrical engineering courses combined. Literally.
                
                   Hardest teacher I've ever taken. The average on the first test was about a 20 percent. And half of the test was &quot;review&quot;. Took him for Analytical Mechanics. DO NOT take his class.
                
                   pretty decent prof but sets the hardest ever exams.wouldn't reccomend him for this reason but a good option if you simply want to learn the subject and grades come in secondary
                
                   This guy is a HARD professor; don't expect an easy class. However, he knows his stuff and you will learn physics better than anybody else if you take his class.
                
                   He was just a TA for the PHYS 201 lab. He would go over exactly what would be on the quiz right before, but the way he explained things was sometimes confusing so I usually didn't pay attention. Easy grader though.
                
                   Absolutely the most challenging and rewarding class I have ever had.  Great orator, clear explanations, and actually invested in the course. Assigned &quot;just enough homework for you to learn the material.&quot; While a very correct statement, prepare for a heavy workload.
                
                   extremly incomprehensible
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I don't really like physics, and I'm not naturally good at it, but I was able to learn the material from Dr. Ford well.  He works examples-very helpful.  Do the homework, similar questions on test.  Also use practice exams.  Doing that, you can make an A.
                
                   Phys 218 @ TAMU is not easy. That being said, Tatiana is the best prof for it (and my fave prof in college thus far). She's passionate about teaching & wants students to succeed, offering help sessions twice a week in addition to office hours. She tells you what you need to know for the exams and goes through many examples in class.
                
                   Many will tell you that PHYS 218 is dreaded by freshman at A&M, but Dr. Tatiana makes it fun for everyone. Her grading is clear and exact, so you know what to expect at all stages. She's always willing to help, and her TAs are amazing and open to helping you outside of class all that you need to pass.
                
                   One of the best profs at TAMU. She cares about her students and wants you to succeed, you just have to be willing to work for your grade! She offers multiple and is always very helpful. She has a Russian accent, but it's not hard to understand at all. I highly recommend taking her for both PHYS 218 and 208. 
                
                   By far the BEST Physics professor. She care for all her students and their academic success. Lectures are very clear and helpful. Would most definitely enroll in her course again.  Does have Russian accent but she's funny and it's nothing too hard to comprehend. 
                
                   She really cares about her students and is hands down the best physics 218 professor.  You are lucky to have her. 
                
                   Dr Erukhimova was an excellent professor. Very willing to help, taught the class very well and clearly had a passion for students and helping them learn. She has an accent but it's very understandable and after the first five minutes you forget about it anyways.
                
                   BEST PHYSICS PROFESSOR. EVER. She is a common exam professor (don't take University Physics). :abs are easy. Very clear, easy to understand, and really cares about her students. Has a Russian accent, but you WILL understand her. REEEEALLLYYY nice, helps you with your grade if you need it. Would take her again. Definitely. Made an A!
                
                   The best prof I have had to date
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Let's just say that unless you can understand a strong willed Russian woman speaking a mile a minute following every piece with a quick &quot;Is that clea&quot; before going on into a subject we should know,&quot; you may want to look into another lecturer.  If you do not rely much on lecture, you may still do okay.  She is willing to offer her help at any time.
                
                   Excellent class.
                
                   
                
                   great teacher
                
                   He's a young teacher, but he knows his stuff.  He teaches his recitation, so he is in complete control of his class.  A pretty nice guy, too, and easy to talk to.
                
                   His classes were not very useful. His test questions consisted mostly of HW problems from Mastering Physics.  In class all he did was go over problems that are in the textbook, and he only uses the board so no power points or online notes.  He was not a terrible teacher, he just has to teach a terrible subject.
                
                   His classes were not very helpful, all the test questions were similar to the HW problems on Mastering Physics... Most of the class time was used going over problems pulled right from the book and he uses only the board, no power points or online notes... He was not a terrible teacher, he just teaches a terrible subject
                
                   The class is very hard and the lectures were useless.
                
                   The lectures can be often boring and somewhat long, but are altogether really interesting. You really do learn a lot in the class, stuff that it is actually relevant. The chapter readings are extremely short and not hard at all. Labs are super easy. Altogether the class is super easy and the teacher makes it really fun. You can tell he enjoys it. 
                
                   I took Dr. Craig for astronomy 1311 and 1312, he is very knowledgeable about the subject matter, but if you are not into astronomy you will more than likely find his lectures and lap boring. Laps are only at night and only meet either on Monday or Wednesday. 
                
                   I'm upset with the amount of extras we have to buy with this course.  Expecting us to buy online homework things, and 'clickers' just because he doesn't want to grade homework seems a bit lazy to me.  The most important purchase isn't one listed, though: Physics for dummies. You will be teaching yourself.
                
                   Boring. Teaches irrelevant things then tests the difficult concepts. Misses class frequently. He missed two classes this semester without sending any kind of word out. I commute 30min each way. Would be considerate of him to pay us the respect we deserve.
                
                   Not a good teacher, good person, but not a good instructor.  Always late or gone, not enough time on exams, grades each test different.
                
                   Something about his voice puts EVERYONE to sleep. Even those in neighboring classrooms and towns.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   What's he even talking about? His powerlifting.. Cool because that'll help Me pass.. 
                